Massachusetts, session 194th, S778.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The fifth sentence of the third paragraph of section 51 of chapter 112 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “by
Medicaid but except as required by federal Medicaid law, shall not seek reimbursement from any
other insurance or third party payor”.
of 1